Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
305A

CAREER AND
TECHNICAL EDUCATION UNDER

FEDERAL
AID

REPEALED. L 2006, c 75, §16.

Cross References

For present provisions, see §§304A-301 to 303 and 304A-2403.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next